West Virginia, session 2026, HB5537.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2I. professional DEVELOPMENT. §1. Repeal of sections related to professional development for West Virginia public school educators. That §18-2I-1 and §18-2I-2 of the Code of West Virginia, 1931, as amended, is repealed.ARTICLE 3. STATE SUPERINTENDENT OF SCHOOLS§1. Repeal of section related to Behavior Interventionist Pilot ProgramThat §18-3-13 of the Code of West Virginia, 1931, as amended, is repealed.ARTICLE 5. COUNTY BOARDS OF EDUCATION§1. Repeal of section related to School Buildings as Child Care Facilities That §18-5-26 of the code of West Virginia, 1931, as amended, is repealed. ARTICLE 8. COMPULSORY SCHOOL ATTENDANCE. §1. Repeal of section related to the High School Graduation Improvement Act. That §18-8-6 of the Code of West Virginia, 1931, as amended, is repealed. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home